Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.220

Correcting filed record.

(1) An entity may correct a filed record if:

(a) The filed record at the time of filing contained an inaccurate statement;

(b) The filed record was defectively executed; or

(c) The electronic transmission of the filed record to the secretary of state was defective.

(2) To correct a filed record, the entity must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of correction.

(3) A statement of correction:

(a) May not state a delayed effective date;

(b) Must be executed by the individual correcting the filed record;

(c) Must identify the filed record to be corrected;

(d) Must specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

(e) Must correct the inaccuracy or defect.

(4) A statement of correction is effective as of the effective date of the filed record that it corrects except as to persons relying on the uncorrected filed record and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, the statement of correction is effective when filed.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.